Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4179.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2024a. Beginning January 1, 1986, sections Sections 2024, 2066, and 2070 shall do not be construed to prohibit a life insurer or life insurance agent producer from giving to each applicant for, or an insured under, a life insurance policy an article of merchandise having an invoice value with a cost to the insurer of $5.00 $50.00 or less per calendar year.